California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(e) The authority shall develop selection criteria to expand local resources, including those described in subdivision (b), and processes for awarding grants after consulting with representatives and interested stakeholders from the mental health treatment community, substance use disorder treatment community, and trauma recovery center providers, including, but not limited to, county behavioral health directors, service providers, consumer organizations, and other appropriate interests, such as health care providers, law enforcement, trial courts, and formerly incarcerated individuals as determined by the authority. The authority shall monitor
 that grants result in cost-effective expansion of the number of community-based resources in regions and communities selected for funding. The authority shall also take into account at least the following criteria and factors when selecting recipients of grants and determining the amount of grant awards:

(1) Description of need, including, at a minimum, a comprehensive description of the project, community need, population to be served, linkage with other public systems of health and mental health care, linkage with local law enforcement, social services, and related assistance, as applicable, and a description of the request for funding.

(2) Ability to serve the target population, which includes individuals eligible for Medi-Cal and individuals eligible for county health and mental health services.

(3) Geographic
 areas or regions of the state to be eligible for grant awards, which may include rural, suburban, and urban areas, and may include use of the five regional designations utilized by the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California.

(4) Level of community engagement and commitment to project completion.

(5) Financial support that, in addition to a grant that may be awarded by the authority, will be sufficient to complete and operate the project for which the grant from the authority is awarded.

(6) Ability to provide additional funding support to the project, including public or private funding, federal tax credits and grants, foundation support, and other collaborative efforts.

(7) Memorandum of understanding among project partners, if
 applicable.

(8) Information regarding the legal status of the collaborating partners, if applicable.

(9) Ability to measure key outcomes, including utilization of services, health and mental health outcomes, and cost benefit of the project.

(f) The authority shall determine maximum grant awards, which shall take into consideration the number of projects awarded to the grantee, as described in subdivision (c), and shall reflect reasonable costs for the project and geographic region. The authority may allocate a grant in increments contingent upon the phases of a project.

(g) Funds awarded by the authority pursuant to this section may be used to supplement, but not to supplant, existing financial and resource commitments of the grantee or any other member
 of a collaborative effort that has been awarded a grant.

(h) All projects that are awarded grants by the authority shall be completed within a reasonable period of time, to be determined by the authority. Funds shall not be released by the authority until the applicant demonstrates project readiness to the authority’s satisfaction. If the authority determines that a grant recipient has failed to complete the project under the terms specified in awarding the grant, the authority may require remedies, including the return of all or a portion of the grant.

(i) The authority may consult with a technical assistance entity, as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 4061, for the purposes of implementing this section.

(j) The authority may adopt emergency regulations relating to the grants for the capital
 capacity and program expansion projects described in this section, including emergency regulations that define eligible costs and determine minimum and maximum grant amounts.

(k) (1) The authority shall provide reports to the fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature on or before April 1, 2018, and annually until April 1, 2020, on the progress of implementation that include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) A description of each project awarded funding.

(B) The amount of each grant issued.

(C) A description of other sources of funding for each project.

(D) The total amount of grants issued.

(E) A description of project operation and implementation, including who is being served.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on April 1, 2024, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(l) A recipient of a grant provided pursuant to paragraph (b) shall adhere to all applicable laws relating to scope of practice, licensure, certification, staffing, and building codes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 33, Sec. 52.   (SB 843)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5848.6.

Any emergency regulations that may be adopted by the California Health Facilities Financing Authority, as described in paragraph (8) of subdivision (d) of Section 5848.5, shall be adopted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of these regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 361, Sec. 3.   (SB 101)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5848.7.

(a) (1) Except as described in subdivision (b), any program or pilot program in which mental health professionals respond in collaboration with law enforcement personnel, or in place of law enforcement personnel, to emergency calls related to mental health crises shall ensure
 that the program is supervised by a licensed mental health professional.

(2) This section does not prohibit the licensed mental health professional supervising the program from also responding to calls and providing care.

(b) If law enforcement collaborates with county behavioral health agencies, supervision of mental health professionals shall be consistent with existing county behavioral health agency standards and requirements for supervision.

(c) For the purposes of this section, a licensed mental health professional means one of the following: 

(1) A licensed clinical social worker, pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4991) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code. 

(2) A licensed professional clinical counselor, pursuant to Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) A licensed marriage and family therapist, pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code. 

(4) A licensed psychologist, pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code. 

(5) A licensed physician under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code who is either a board certified psychiatrist or has completed a residency in psychiatry.

(6) A registered nurse licensed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code who possesses a master’s degree in psychiatric-mental health nursing and is listed as a psychiatric-mental health nurse by the
 Board of Registered Nursing, or any advanced practice registered nurse certified as a clinical nurse specialist pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 2838) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code who participates in expert clinical practice in the specialty of psychiatric-mental health nursing.

(d) This section does not alter the scope of practice for a health care professional or authorize the delivery of health care services in a setting or manner that is not authorized pursuant to the Business and Professions Code or the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 137, Sec. 1.   (AB 465)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.9. The No Place Like Home Program [5849.1. - 5849.15.]

5849.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that this part is consistent with and furthers the purposes of the Mental Health Services Act, enacted by Proposition 63 at the November 2, 2004, statewide general election, within the meaning of Section 18 of that measure.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Housing is a key factor for stabilization and recovery to occur and results in improved outcomes for individuals living with a mental illness.

(2) Untreated mental illness can increase the risk of homelessness,
 especially for single adults.

(3) California has the nation’s largest homeless population, which is disproportionally comprised of women with children and youth, veterans, and the chronically homeless.

(4) California has the largest number of homeless veterans in the United States at 24 percent of the total population in our nation. Fifty percent of California’s homeless veterans live with serious mental illness and 70 percent have a substance use disorder.

(5) Fifty percent of mothers experiencing homelessness have experienced a major depressive episode since becoming homeless, and 36 percent of these mothers live with post-traumatic stress disorder and 41 percent have a substance use disorder.

(6) Ninety-three percent of supportive housing tenants who live with mental illness and substance use disorders voluntarily participated in the services offered.

(7) Adults who receive two years of “whatever-it-takes,” or Full-Service Partnership services, experience a 68-percent reduction in homelessness.

(8) For every dollar of bond funds invested in permanent supportive housing, the state and local governments can leverage a significant amount of additional dollars through tax credits, Medicaid health services funding, and other housing development funds.

(9) Tenants of permanent supportive housing reduced their visits to the emergency department by
 56 percent and their hospital admissions by 45 percent.

(10) The cost in public services for a chronically homeless Californian ranges from $60,000 to $100,000 annually. When housed, these costs are cut in half and some reports show reductions in cost of more than 70 percent, including potentially less involvement with the health and criminal justice systems.

(11) Californians have identified homelessness as their top tier priority. This measure seeks to address the needs of the most vulnerable people within this population.

(12) Having counties provide mental health programming and services is a benefit to the state.

(13) The Department of Housing and
 Community Development is the state entity with sufficient expertise to implement and oversee a grant or loan program for permanent supportive housing of the target population.

(14) The California Health Facilities Financing Authority is authorized by law to issue bonds and to consult with the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission and the State Department of Health Care Services concerning the implementation of a grant or loan program for California counties to support the development of programs that increase access to, and capacity for, crisis mental health services. It is therefore appropriate for the authority to issue bonds and contract for services with the Department of Housing and Community Development to provide grants or loans to California counties for permanent supportive housing for the target
 population.

(15) Use of bond funding will accelerate the availability of funding for the grant or loan program to provide permanent supportive housing for the target population as compared to relying on annual allocations from the Behavioral Health Services Fund and better allow counties to provide permanent supportive housing for homeless individuals living with mental illness.

(16) The findings and declarations set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 5849.35 are hereby incorporated herein.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 67) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 68.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.2.

As used in this part, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “At risk of chronic homelessness” includes, but is not limited to, persons who are at high risk of long-term or intermittent homelessness, including persons with mental illness exiting institutionalized settings, including, but not limited to, jail, mental health, and substance use disorder facilities, who were homeless prior to admission, transition age youth experiencing homelessness or with significant barriers to housing stability, and others, as defined in program guidelines.

(b) “Authority” means the California Health Facilities Financing Authority established pursuant to Part 7.2 (commencing with Section 15430) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code.

(c) “Capitalized operating reserves” has the same meaning as defined in Section 50058.8 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) “Chronically homeless” has the same meaning as defined in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations as that section read on May 1, 2016, or as otherwise modified or expanded by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(e) “Commission” means the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission established by Section 5845.

(f) “Committee” means the No Place Like Home Program Advisory Committee established pursuant to Section 5849.3.

(g) “County” includes, but is not limited to, a city and a city and county
 receiving funds pursuant to Section 5701.5.

(h) “Department” means the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(i) “Development sponsor” has the same meaning as “sponsor” as defined in Section 50675.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(j) “Fund” means the No Place Like Home Fund established pursuant to Section 5849.4.

(k) “Homeless” has the same meaning as defined in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations as that section read on May 1, 2016.

 (l) “Permanent supportive housing” has the same meaning as “supportive housing,” as defined in Section 50675.14 of the Health and Safety Code, except that “permanent supportive housing” shall include associated
 facilities if used to provide services to housing residents.

(m) (1) “Program” means the process for awarding funds and distributing moneys to applicants established in Sections 5849.7, 5849.8, and 5849.9 and the ongoing monitoring and enforcement of the applicants’ activities pursuant to Sections 5849.8, 5849.9, and 5849.11.

(2) “Competitive program” means the portion of the program established by Section 5849.8.

(3) “Distribution program” means the portion of the program described in Section 5849.9.

(n) “Target population” means individuals or households, as provided in Section 5600.3, who are homeless, chronically homeless, or at risk of chronic homelessness.

(o) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 22, Sec. 66.   (AB 130)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.3.

(a) There is hereby established the No Place Like Home Program Advisory Committee. Membership on the committee shall be as follows:

(1) The Director of Housing and Community Development, or their designee, who shall serve as the chairperson of the committee.

(2) The Director of Health Care Services, or their designee, and an additional representative.

(3) The Secretary of Veterans Affairs or their designee.

(4) The Director of Social Services or their designee.

(5) The Treasurer or their designee.

(6) The Chair of the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission or their designee.

(7) A chief administrative officer of a small county or a member of a county board of supervisors of a small county, as provided by subdivision (d) of Section 5849.6, to be appointed by the Governor.

(8) A chief administrative officer of a large county or a member of a county board of supervisors of a large county, as provided by subdivision (b) of Section 5849.6, to be appointed by the Governor.

(9) A director of a county behavioral health department, to be appointed
 by the Governor.

(10) An administrative officer of a city, to be appointed by the Governor.

(11) A representative of an affordable housing organization, to be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(12) A resident of supportive housing, to be appointed by the Governor.

(13) A representative of a community behavioral health organization, to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(14) A representative of a local or regional continuum of care organization that coordinates homelessness funding, to be appointed by the Governor.

(b) The committee shall do all of the following:

(1) Assist and advise the department in the implementation of the program.

(2) Review and make recommendations on the department’s guidelines.

(3) Review the department’s progress in distributing moneys pursuant to this part.

(4) Provide advice and guidance more broadly on statewide homelessness issues.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 71) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 72.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.35.

(a) The authority may do all of the following:

(1) Consult with the commission and the State Department of Health Care Services concerning the implementation of the No Place Like Home Program, including the review of annual reports provided to the authority by the department pursuant to Section 5849.11.

(2) Enter into one or more single-year or multiyear contracts with the department for the department to provide, and the authority to pay the department for providing, services described in Sections 5849.7, 5849.8, and 5849.9, related to permanent supportive housing for the target population and to provide for payments to the department from amounts on deposit in the Supportive Housing Program
 Subaccount created within the Behavioral Health Services Fund pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 5890. Before entering into any contract pursuant to this paragraph, the executive director of the authority shall transmit to the commission a copy of the contract in substantially final form. The contract shall be deemed approved by the commission unless it acts within 10 days to disapprove the contract.

(3) On or before June 15 and December 15 of each year, the authority shall certify to the Controller the amounts the authority is required to pay as provided in Section 5890 for the following six-month period to the department pursuant to any service contract entered into pursuant to paragraph (2).

(b) The department may do all of the following:

(1) Enter into one or more single-year or multiyear
 contracts with the authority to provide services described in Sections 5849.7, 5849.8, and 5849.9, related to permanent supportive housing for the target population and to receive payments from amounts on deposit in the Supportive Housing Program Subaccount pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 5890. Payments received by the department under any service contract authorized by this paragraph shall be used, before any other allocation or distribution, to repay loans from the authority pursuant to Section 15463 of the Government Code.

(2) Enter into one or more loan agreements with the authority as security for the repayment of the revenue bonds issued by the authority pursuant to Section 15463 of the Government Code. The department shall deposit the proceeds of these loans, excluding any refinancing loans to redeem, refund, or retire bonds, into the fund. The department’s obligations to make payments under these loan agreements
 shall be limited obligations payable solely from amounts received pursuant to its service contracts with the authority.

(3) The department may pledge and assign its right to receive all or a portion of the payments under the service contracts entered into pursuant to paragraph (1) directly to the authority or its bond trustee for the payment of principal, premiums, if any, and interest under any loan agreement authorized by paragraph (2).

(c) The Legislature hereby finds and declares both of the following:

(1) The consideration to be paid by the authority to the department for the services provided pursuant to the contracts authorized by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is fair and reasonable and in the public interest.

(2) The service contracts and payments made by the authority to the department pursuant to a service contract authorized by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) and the loan agreements and loan repayments made by the department to the authority pursuant to a loan agreement authorized by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall not constitute a debt or liability, or a pledge of the faith and credit, of the state or any political subdivision, except as approved by the voters at the November 6, 2018, statewide general election.

(d) The state hereby covenants with the holders from time to time of any bonds issued by the authority pursuant to Section 15463 of the Government Code that it will not alter, amend, or restrict the provisions of this section, paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 5890, subdivision (b) of Section 5891, Section 19602.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or any other provision
 requiring the deposit of the revenues derived from the additional tax imposed under Section 17043 of the Revenue and Taxation Code into the Behavioral Health Services Fund in any manner adverse to the interests of those bondholders so long as any of those bonds remain outstanding. The authority may include this covenant in the resolution, indenture, or other documents governing the bonds.

(e) Agreements under this section are not subject to, and need not comply with, the requirements of any other law applicable to the execution of those agreements, including, but not limited to, the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(f) Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code shall not apply to any contract entered into between the authority and the department under
 this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 44.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 85 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 40.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 6, 2018, by Prop 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.4.

(a) The No Place Like Home Fund is hereby created within the State Treasury and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, continuously appropriated to the department, the authority, and the Treasurer for the purposes of this part. Accounts and subaccounts may be created within the fund as needed. Up to 5 percent of the amount deposited in the fund may be used for administrative expenses in implementing this part.

(b) There shall be paid into the fund the following:

(1) Any moneys from the receipt of loan proceeds by the department derived from the issuance of bonds by the authority under subdivision (b) of
 Section 15463 of the Government Code.

(2) Any appropriation or transfer to the fund from the General Fund or other funds.

(3) Any other federal or state grant, or from any private donation or grant, for the purposes of this part.

(4) Any interest payment, loan repayments, or other return of funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 41, Sec. 4.   Effective December 19, 2018.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 6, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.5.

The department may adopt guidelines or regulations, including emergency regulations to expedite the award of moneys pursuant to this part, in consultation with the California State Association of Counties and other stakeholders, as necessary to exercise the powers and perform the duties conferred or imposed on it by this part. Any guideline or regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code). The department shall consult with key stakeholders, including, but not limited to, counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 322, Sec. 7.   (AB 1628)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.6.

For the purpose of administering Sections 5849.7 and 5849.8, the department shall organize counties into the following competitive groupings based on population:

(a) The County of Los Angeles.

(b) Large counties with a population greater than 750,000.

(c) Medium counties with a population between 200,000 to 750,000.

(d) Small counties with a population less than 200,000.

The competitive program shall distribute funding among the groupings based on a calculation made by the department that
 shall include the number of homeless persons residing within each county, as determined by the department, and considers minimum funding levels necessary for a permanent supportive housing development. The department, at its discretion, may consider other factors in the calculation if it supports the objectives of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 43, Sec. 5.   (AB 1618)   Effective July 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.7.

(a) In order to finance permanent supportive housing for the target population, the department may enter into one or more contracts with the authority as authorized pursuant to Section 5849.35 to provide services for the benefit of the people of the state as described in this section and Sections 5849.8 and 5849.9. The department shall use its best efforts to provide or cause to be provided permanent supportive housing for the target population in consideration for service contract payments to be received from the authority.

(b) Under any service contract with the authority, the department shall administer a competitive program, pursuant to Section 5849.8, and distribution program, pursuant to Section 5849.9, for awarding a total amount not to exceed two billion
 dollars ($2,000,000,000) among counties to finance capital costs including, but not limited to, acquisition, design, construction, rehabilitation, or preservation, and to capitalize operating reserves, of permanent supportive housing for the target population. For purposes of this section and Sections 5849.8 and 5849.9, measurement of the dollar limit on amounts to be distributed by the department shall be based on the principal amount of bonds issued by the authority and loaned to the department, exclusive of any refunding bonds but including any net premium derived from the sale of the bonds, for deposit in the fund. There shall be no dollar limit on the distribution of moneys in the fund derived from the sources described in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 5849.4.

(c) For the competitive program established by Section 5849.8, the following shall apply:

(1) A county may apply as the sole applicant if it is the development sponsor or jointly with a separate entity as development sponsor.

(2) Funded developments shall integrate the target population with the general public.

(3) Funded developments shall utilize low barrier tenant selection practices that prioritize vulnerable populations and offer flexible, voluntary, and individualized supportive services.

(4) The guidelines may provide for alternative housing models, such as shared housing models of fewer than five units. Integration requirements may be modified in shared housing.

(5) Funds shall be offered as either of the following:

(A) Deferred payment loans to finance
 capital costs including acquisition, design, construction, rehabilitation, or preservation, of permanent supportive housing for the target population.

 (B) Grants for the capitalized operating subsidy reserve, as specified by the department in its guidelines, for permanent supportive housing for the target population.

(6) The department shall adopt guidelines establishing income and rent standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 165, Sec. 12.   (SB 1030)   Effective September 25, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5849.8.

(a) Under any service contract entered into pursuant to Section 5849.35, the department may allocate an amount not to exceed one billion eight hundred million dollars ($1,800,000,000) from the fund for the purposes of the competitive program described in this subdivision and the alternative process described in subdivision (b). The department shall develop a competitive application process for the purpose of awarding moneys pursuant to this section. In considering applications, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Restrict eligibility to applicants that meet the following minimum criteria:

(A) The county commits to provide mental health supportive services and to coordinate the provision
 of or referral to other services, including, but not limited to, substance use treatment services, to the tenants of the supportive housing development for at least 20 years. Services shall be provided onsite at the supportive housing development or in a location otherwise easily accessible to tenants. The county may use, but is not restricted to using, any of the following available funding sources as allowed by state and federal law:

(i) The Local Mental Health Services Fund established pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 5892.

(ii) The Mental Health Account within the Local Health Welfare Trust Fund established pursuant to Section 17600.10.

(iii) The Behavioral Health Subaccount within the County Local Revenue Fund 2011 established pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 30025 of the Government
 Code.

(iv) Funds received from other private or public entities.

(v) Other county funds.

(B) The county has developed a county plan to combat homelessness, which includes a description of homelessness countywide, any special challenges or barriers to serving the target population, county resources applied to address the issue, available community-based resources, an outline of partners and collaborations, and proposed solutions.

(C) Meet other threshold requirements, including, but not limited to, developer capacity to develop, own, and operate a permanent supportive housing development for the target population, application proposes a financially feasible development with reasonable development costs.

(2) The department shall evaluate applications using, at minimum, the following criteria:

(A) The extent to which units assisted by the program are restricted to persons who are chronically homeless or at risk of chronic homelessness within the target population.

(B) The extent to which funds are leveraged for capital costs.

(C) The extent to which projects achieve deeper affordability through the use of nonstate project-based rental assistance, operating subsidies, or other funding.

(D) Project readiness.

(E) The extent to which applicants offer a range of onsite and off-site supportive services to tenants, including mental health services, behavioral health services, primary
 health, employment, and other tenancy support services.

(F) Past history of implementing programs that use evidence-based best practices that have led to the reduction of the number of chronic homeless or at risk of chronic homelessness individuals within the target population.

(b) The department may establish an alternative process for allocating funds directly to counties, as calculated in Section 5849.6, with at least 5 percent of the state’s homeless population and that demonstrate the capacity to directly administer loan and grant funds for permanent supportive housing serving the target population and the ability to prioritize individuals with mental health supportive needs who are homeless or at risk of chronic homelessness, consistent with this part and as determined by the department. The department shall adopt guidelines establishing the parameters of an alternative
 process, if any, and requirements for local administration of funds, including, but not limited to, project selection process, eligible use of funds, loan and grant terms, rent and occupancy restrictions, provision of services, and reporting and monitoring requirements. Counties participating in the alternative process shall not be eligible for the competitive process and shall be limited to funds in proportion to their share of the percentage of the statewide homeless population, as calculated by the department in Section 5849.6. Funds not committed to supportive housing developments within two years following award of funds to counties shall be returned to the state for the purposes of the competitive program. The department shall consider the following when selecting participating counties:

(1) Demonstrated ability to finance permanent supportive housing with local and federal funds, and monitor requirements for the life of the loan.

(2) Past history of delivering supportive services to the target population in housing.

(3) Past history of committing project-based vouchers to supportive housing.

(4) Ability to prioritize the most vulnerable within the target population through coordinated entry system.

(c) The department shall set aside 8 percent of funds offered in rounds 1 to 4, inclusive, for the competitive program for small counties as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 5849.6.

(d) The department shall award funds for the competitive program in at least four rounds as follows:

(1) The department shall issue its first request for proposal for the
 competitive program no later than 180 days after the effective date of a final judgment, with no further opportunity for appeals, in any court proceeding affirming the validity of the contracts authorized by the authority and the department pursuant to Section 5849.35 and any bonds authorized to be issued by the authority pursuant to Section 15463 of the Government Code and any contracts related to those bonds.

(2) The second round shall be completed no later than one year after the completion of the first round.

(3) The third round shall be completed no later than one year after the completion of the second round.

(4) The fourth round shall be completed no later than one year after the completion of the third round.

(5) Subsequent rounds shall occur
 annually thereafter in order to fully exhaust remaining funds and the department may discontinue the use of the competitive groupings in Section 5849.6, the alternative process in subdivision (b) for any funds not awarded by the county, and the rural set-aside funds as set forth in subdivision (c).

(e) (1) Any loans for capital costs made by the department pursuant to this section shall be in the form of secured deferred payment loans to pay for the eligible costs of development. All unpaid principal and accumulated interest is due and payable no later than completion of the term of the loan, which shall be established through program guidelines adopted pursuant to Section 5849.5. The loan shall bear simple interest at a rate of 3 percent per annum on the unpaid principal balance. The department shall require annual loan payments in the minimum amount necessary to cover the costs of project monitoring. For the first 15
 years of the loan term, the amount of the required loan payments shall not exceed forty-two hundredths of 1 percent per annum. Funds shall be offered as grants for the capitalized operating reserves.

(2) The department may establish maximum loan-to-value requirements for some or all of the types of projects that are eligible for funding under this part, which shall be established through program guidelines adopted pursuant to Section 5849.5.

(3) The department shall establish per-unit and per-project loan limits for all project types.

(f) (1) The department may designate an amount not to exceed 4 percent of funds allocated for the competitive program, not including funding allocated pursuant to subdivision (b), in order to cure or avert a default on the terms of any loan or other obligation by
 the recipient of financial assistance, or bidding at any foreclosure sale where the default or foreclosure sale would jeopardize the department’s security in the rental housing development assisted pursuant to this part. The funds so designated shall be known as the “default reserve.”

(2) The department may use default reserve funds made available pursuant to this section to repair or maintain any rental housing development assistance pursuant to this part to protect the department’s security interest.

(3) The payment or advance of funds by the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be exclusively within the department’s discretion, and no person shall be deemed to have any entitlement to the payment or advance of those funds. The amount of any funds expended by the department for the purposes of curing or averting a default shall be added to the loan amount secured by the
 rental housing development and shall be payable to the department upon demand.

(g) (1) Before disbursement of any funds for loans or grants made pursuant to this section, the department shall enter into a regulatory agreement with the development sponsor that provides for all of the following:

(A) Sets standards for tenant selection to ensure occupancy of assisted units by eligible households of very low and low income for the term of the agreement.

(B) Governs the terms of occupancy agreements.

(C) Contains provisions to maintain affordable rent levels to serve eligible households.

(D) Provides for periodic inspections and review of yearend fiscal audits and related
 reports by the department.

(E) Permits a developer to distribute earnings in an amount established by the department and based on the number of units in the rental housing development.

(F) Has a term for not less than the original term of the loan.

(G) Contains any other provisions necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

(2) The agreement shall be binding upon the developer and successors in interest upon sale or transfer of the rental housing development regardless of any prepayment of the loan.

(3) The agreement shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder in the county in which the real property subject to the agreement is located.
